California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 municipal operators designated on September 25, 1991, or July 1, 1992, who, since that time, have received annual allocations of local sales tax funding in lieu of specified formula funds, shall continue to receive those same formula-equivalent levels of funding from local discretionary sources. Included municipal operators who receive annual allocations of local sales tax funding for specified services or service levels shall continue to receive equivalent levels of funding allocated from local sources for these services in the 1995–96 fiscal year.

(j) Ninety percent of the Proposition C 5 percent security funds shall be allocated to the included and eligible municipal operators and the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority according to their proportionate number of transit passengers served. The funds shall be allocated only to those operators which have filed with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation
 Authority a cost-effective program to provide transit security services. Any unallocated funds shall revert to the remaining balance of security funds which shall be disbursed at the discretion of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(k) This section shall not impact or restrict the use of those portions of Mills-Deddeh Transportation Development Act, Proposition A, or Proposition C local return or other transportation funds allocated to cities or counties by population nor shall this section restrict the level or source of funding programmed by local jurisdiction to operators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 554, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

99285.1.

For any fiscal year commencing on and after July 1, 1975, in determining the allocation of any operator pursuant to Section 99285, the public transit service mileage of any operator which has lost any days of operation due to strikes occurring prior to August 1, 1975, civil disorders, or acts of God shall equal its actual public transit service mileage times the number of days it would have been in operation but for such causes, divided by the number of days it was in actual operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 698.)
-------------------------------------------

99285.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 99285, any county transportation commission created pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) may adopt a resolution electing to approve the proposals to be funded and shall approve only those claims submitted for its approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99286.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no operator may plan or establish a public transportation system by adding or extending routes, by acquisition or otherwise, into the area of a contiguous transit district, nor may moneys be allocated from the fund of the county where such addition or extension is contemplated for such purposes, without the consent of the affected transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99287.

(a) No provision of this article shall preclude the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District from planning, acquiring, constructing, and operating its system within or without the territory of the district as provided for by Article 5 (commencing with Section 29030), Chapter 6, Part 2 of Division 10. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 99220, in the event an extension is to be made into a county for which services have not been provided, the moneys within the fund of that county may be used to pay the costs of securing such services.

(b) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a) or the limitations of Section 99231, during a period of up to five years that the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District is planning any extension of its system into a county outside of the district but with a coterminous boundary with the district and which contains a major transportation facility belonging to another county or city and county, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission may order that any funds in the local transportation fund of such county that are not necessary to pay approved claims under Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) of this chapter be retained.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 99303 by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99288.

(a) Any city, county, or transit district may enter into a contract with any operator, except with an included municipal operator unless specifically approved by the governing body of the transit district in whose area the included municipal operator is located, for the operator to provide public transportation service in the city, county, or transit district. In that case, the operator providing the service may include the claim of the city, county, or transit district, as the case may be, with its claim. The claim may include an amount for reimbursement of the actual costs incurred by the city, county, or transit district for
 the administration, review, and monitoring of the contract. The amount so claimed shall not exceed 5 percent of the total amount of the contract for public transportation service in the city, county, or transit district.

(b) With the prior express authorization of the department, a transit district may include in its claim a proportional amount for regularly scheduled services outside its boundaries even though the contract specified in subdivision (a) has not been executed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

99289.

(a) Funds received by a city or county designated as an included municipal operator pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99207 because it is not receiving adequate local public transportation service from any transit districts in which it is located may only be used by such a city or county to contract with an operator for public transportation services.

(b) If the Metropolitan Transportation Commission determines that it is not feasible on the basis of, among other things, cost to contract with an operator pursuant to subdivision (a), the city or county may use the funds for either
 or both of the following:

(1) The development and operation of a public transportation system.

(2) Public transportation service received under contract from an operator providing such service since at least July 1, 1972, or from a common carrier, as defined in Section 211, which is under the jurisdiction and control of the Public Utilities Commission and which is engaged in the transportation of persons, as defined in Section 208.

(c) The system or the service under the contract, as the case may be, shall be consistent, as determined by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, with the regional transportation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

99299.

The provisions of this article shall control over the provisions of any other act or law applicable to a transit district to the extent of any conflict with such provisions.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 99285 by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [99301. - 99304.]

99301.

Interest earned on funds allocated pursuant to this chapter shall be expended only for those purposes for which the funds were allocated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

99301.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 99232, 99233, and 99301, the Orange County Transportation Commission may direct the transportation planning agency to allocate interest accruing from money retained for the development of transit in the local transportation fund of the County of Orange, to the County of Orange, to cities within the county, to the Department of Transportation, to the Orange County Transit District, and to the Orange County Transportation Commission to expend for transportation purposes within the County of Orange, as determined by the Orange County Transportation Commission, including those which could be funded by motor vehicle fuel taxes
 pursuant to Section 1 of Article XIX of the California Constitution. The commission, when determining the purposes for which the money is to be expended, shall ensure that, to the extent possible, at least one-half of the money is allocated to local street and road projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

99301.6.

Interest accruing pursuant to Section 99301.5 shall continue to be allocated under that section for as long as there is a balance of money retained for the development of transit in the local transportation fund of the County of Orange. For this purpose, the amount of the balance retained for the development of transit in the local transportation fund shall be determined by the Orange County Transportation Commission with the concurrence of the Orange County Transit District prior to the beginning of each fiscal year.

After the allocation instructions have been received from the transportation planning
 agency, the interest accruing shall be deposited in a separate account maintained by the Orange County Treasurer, which shall be known as the Orange County Unified Transportation Trust. Thereafter, the Orange County Transportation Commission shall issue allocation instructions on the balance in the Orange County Unified Transportation Trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 951, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

99302.

Notwithstanding the fact that the Metropolitan Transportation Commission is not required to adopt a regional transportation plan until June 30, 1973, for the region comprised of the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma, it may approve the claim of any applicant within the region.

The commission shall approve those claims which will not result in the undesirable duplication of public transportation services, and which will provide for a coordinated public transportation system, in the region.

The commission may, on its own motion, arbitrate differences (1) between the various applicants, (2) between an applicant and a city or county regarding the costs of the extension of services, and (3) between the various entities within the region regarding priorities and the order that various improvements are to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99302.5.

Before the Orange County Transit District may expend any of its allocation it has retained for the development of rapid transit for purposes other than such development, the Orange County Transportation Commission shall make a determination that the funds are not required for any exclusive public mass transit guideway purpose within the foreseeable future.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

99303.

Not less than 75 percent of the unallocated apportionment, as of June 30, 1978, and each June 30th thereafter, for the cities, and that portion of the County of San Diego, under the jurisdiction of the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall be available to the board for exclusive public mass transit guideway purposes as specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 120260) of Chapter 4 of Division 11.

On July 1 of the first fiscal year of implementation of Section 120265, this section shall no longer be effective except as to the prior year’s unallocated apportionment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1124, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99304.

Notwithstanding Section 29530 of the Government Code, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall, if an unallocated apportionment has been set aside for an operator for specific future expenditures, also set aside annually the interest earned on the unallocated apportionment that has been set aside until the unallocated apportionment is allocated, and shall include the set-aside interest in the amount apportioned to that operator. The interest amount shall be determined by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission based on its estimate of the average rate of interest earned by the unallocated apportionment during the prior fiscal
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1014, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Transportation Planning and Development Account [99310. - 99319.]

99310.

(a) The Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund, hereafter referred to as the “account” in this article, is hereby continued in existence as the Public Transportation Account in the fund.

(b) Any reference in any law or regulation to the Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund is a reference to the Public Transportation Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 622, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

99310.5.

(a) The account is hereby designated a trust fund.

(b) The funds in the account shall be available, when appropriated by the Legislature, only for transportation planning and mass transportation purposes, as specified by the Legislature.

(c) The Legislature may amend this section by statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, if the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this section.

(History: Amended June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

99310.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon order of the Department of Finance, all or some of the state agencies collecting revenue for, or spending from, the Public Transportation Account shall adjust budgeting, accounting, and reporting systems and documents so that unliquidated encumbrances, payables, and other accruals are not reflected in the fund balance in the Governor’s Budget fund condition display or the fund balance in the financial statements submitted to the Controller for the budgetary-legal basis annual report.

(b) For the purposes of the Governor’s Budget, the balance of cash advanced from the Public Transportation Account to the Transportation Revolving Account, as jointly
 determined by the Department of Finance and the state agencies referenced in subdivision (a), shall be deemed as resources and cash available to the Public Transportation Account for budgeting purposes.

(c) This method shall be effective with the 2013–14 Governor’s Budget development process and may be applied to the 2011–12 data.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 6.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99311.

Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds transferred, or scheduled as a reimbursement, to the account, pursuant to Section 21682.5 of this code and Section 194 of the Streets and Highways Code, shall be available for allocation by the director for the following purposes:

(a) State transportation planning.

(b) Regional transportation planning by transportation planning agencies designated pursuant to Section 29532 of the
 Government Code, but not those specified in subdivision (b) of Section 29532.4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1172, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

99311.1.

Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the director shall allocate, from the account or from other available state or federal sources, or from both state and federal sources, for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 99311, an amount commensurate with the historical annual allocation to transportation planning agencies designated pursuant to Section 29532 of the Government Code that do not directly receive federal planning funds, as set forth in Section 134 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 436, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

99311.5.

The amount allocated to a transportation planning agency designated pursuant to Section 29532 of the Government Code, for the preparation or updating of a regional transportation plan pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Title 7 of that code, may be up to 70 percent of its nonfederally reimbursed costs for regional transportation planning.

For a transportation planning agency in a county with a population of less than 500,000 persons, the director may increase that percentage, if the director determines it to be in the best interests of regional and state transportation planning to do
 so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.

Except as provided in Sections 99311 and 99311.5, and Sections 6051.8 and 6201.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the funds in the account shall be made available for the following purposes:

(a) Fifty percent for purposes of Section 99315, subject to appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) To the Controller, 25 percent for allocation to transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to Section 99314, for the purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program. These funds are hereby continuously appropriated for these purposes.

(c) To the Controller, 25 percent for allocation
 to transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to Section 99313, for the purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program. These funds are hereby continuously appropriated for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 2.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.1.

(a) Revenues transferred to the Public Transportation Account pursuant to Sections 6051.8 and 6201.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the State Transit Assistance Program are hereby continuously appropriated to the Controller for allocation as follows:

(1) Fifty percent for allocation to transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to Section 99314, for purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program.

(2) Fifty percent for allocation to transportation agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to Section 99313, for purposes of the State
 Transit Assistance Program.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the revenues allocated pursuant to this section shall be subject to the same requirements as revenues allocated pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), as applicable, of Section 99312.

(c) The revenues transferred to the Public Transportation Account for the State Transit Assistance Program that are attributable to subdivision (a) of Section 11053 of the Revenue and Taxation Code are hereby continuously appropriated to the Controller, and, upon allocation pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314, shall only be expended on the following:

(1) Transit capital projects or services to maintain or repair a transit operator’s existing transit vehicle fleet or existing transit facilities, including rehabilitation or modernization of existing vehicles or facilities.

(2) The design, acquisition, and construction of new vehicles or facilities that improve existing transit services.

(3) Transit services that complement local efforts for repair and improvement of local transportation infrastructure.

(d) (1) Before receiving an apportionment of funds pursuant to subdivision (c) from the Controller in a fiscal year, a recipient transit agency shall submit to the department a list of projects proposed to be funded with these funds. The list of projects proposed to be funded with these funds shall include a description and location of each proposed project, a proposed schedule for the project’s completion, and the estimated useful life of the improvement. The project list shall not limit the flexibility of a recipient transit agency to fund projects in accordance with
 local needs and priorities so long as the projects are consistent with subdivision (c).

(2) The department shall report to the Controller the recipient transit agencies that have submitted a list of projects as described in this subdivision and that are therefore eligible to receive an apportionment of funds for the applicable fiscal year. The Controller, upon receipt of the report, shall apportion funds quarterly pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314.

(e) For each fiscal year, each recipient transit agency receiving an apportionment of funds pursuant to subdivision (c) shall, upon expending those funds, submit documentation to the department that includes a description and location of each completed project, the amount of funds expended on the project, the completion date, and the estimated useful life of the improvement.

(f) The audit of transit operator finances required pursuant to Section 99245 shall verify that the revenues identified in subdivision (c) have been expended in conformance with these specific requirements and all other generally applicable requirements.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller shall allocate the funds made available in subdivision (c) in the 2020–21 to 2025–26, inclusive, fiscal years pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314 and, for the funds allocated pursuant to Section 99314, shall allocate those funds in accordance with the individual operator ratios described in Section 99314.10.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (c), a recipient transit agency may expend funds apportioned pursuant to subdivision (c) for the 2019–20 to 2025–26, inclusive, fiscal years on any operating or capital costs
 to maintain transit service levels if the governing board of the recipient transit agency makes a declaration that the expenditure of those funds is necessary to prevent transit service levels from being reduced or eliminated.

(2) The requirements of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) do not apply to the receipt or expenditure of funds pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 54, Sec. 8.   (SB 125)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.2.

(a) The State Transit Assistance Program, also known as the STA program, which provides for allocations of funds made available from the Public Transportation Account pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314, and which is governed by Sections 99312 to 99314.9, inclusive, is hereby continued in existence. The purpose of the STA program is to provide a source of state funding to eligible public transportation operators and other transportation agencies in order to support their local and regional transit operating and capital needs.

(b) For purposes of the STA program, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Public transportation operator” has the same meaning as
 “operator,” as defined in Section 99210, as long as that operator operates a “public transportation system,” as defined in Section 99211.

(2) “STA-eligible operator” means a public transportation operator eligible to claim local transportation funds under either Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) or Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400), or under both articles. 

(c) The only entities eligible to receive direct allocations from the Controller under Sections 99313 and 99314 shall be transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board. The Controller shall distribute funds attributable to transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board to the applicable county treasurer’s office. Upon the request of a transportation
 planning agency, county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the Controller shall instead distribute the applicable funds directly to the requesting agency.

(d) Only STA-eligible operators shall be eligible to receive STA program funds allocated by transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to Section 99314. An STA-eligible operator, at its discretion, may further suballocate funds it receives pursuant to Section 99314 to an entity operating local community transit services that is eligible to claim local transportation funds pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) but that is otherwise ineligible to directly receive funds allocated pursuant to Section 99314.

(e) An entity operating community transit services pursuant to Article
 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) may be allocated funds pursuant to Section 99313 as a subrecipient at the discretion of the transportation planning agency, the county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board.

(f) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, which is both a county transportation commission for purposes of Sections 99313 and 99314, and an STA-eligible operator for purposes of Section 99314, may incorporate into its report pursuant to Section 99243 any operating costs for local community transit service under contract with the authority, including service provided by a consolidated transportation service agency pursuant to Section 99204.5 or by operators eligible to expend local transportation funds only under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 5.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.3.

Revenues transferred to the Public Transportation Account pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 6051.8 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 6201.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code are hereby continuously appropriated to the Transportation Agency for distribution in the following manner:

(a) (1) Fifty percent of available annual revenues under this section shall be allocated by the Transportation Agency to the public agencies, including joint powers agencies, responsible for state-supported intercity rail services. A minimum of 25 percent of the funds available under this subdivision shall be allocated to each of the state’s three intercity rail corridors that provide regularly scheduled intercity rail service.

(2) The Transportation Agency shall adopt guidelines governing the administration of the funds available under this subdivision, including provisions providing authority for loans of these funds by mutual agreement between intercity rail service corridors.

(b) (1) Fifty percent of available annual revenues under this section shall be allocated by the Transportation Agency to the public agencies, including joint powers agencies, responsible for commuter rail services. For the 2018–19 and 2019–20 fiscal years, 20 percent of the funds available under this subdivision shall be allocated to each of the state’s five commuter rail service providers that provide regularly scheduled commuter rail service. Commencing July 1, 2020, the funds available under this subdivision shall be allocated based on guidelines and a distribution formula adopted by the Transportation
 Agency.

(2) On or before July 1, 2019, the Transportation Agency shall prepare a draft of the proposed guidelines and distribution formula and make them available for public comment. In preparing the proposed guidelines and distribution formula, the agency shall consult with the state’s five commuter rail service providers. The final guidelines and distribution formula shall be adopted on or before January 1, 2020. The guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to, provisions providing authority for loans of these funds by mutual agreement between commuter rail service providers and providing for baseline allocations to each provider.

(c) The funds made available by this section may be used for operations and capital improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 20.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.4.

Revenues transferred to the Public Transportation Account pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11053 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program (Part 2 (commencing with Section 75220) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code) shall be available for appropriation to that program pursuant to the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 21.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.5.

(a) In the case of a transportation planning agency with county transportation commissions within its area of jurisdiction, the allocations pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314 to the transportation planning agency shall be determined by excluding the areas also under the jurisdiction of the county transportation commissions.

(b) In the case of the transportation planning agency with the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board within its area of jurisdiction, the allocations pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314 to the
 transportation planning agency shall be determined by excluding the area also under the jurisdiction of the transit development board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.   Effective June 29, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

99312.7.

(a) Not later than each January 31st, for purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program, the Controller shall compute, publish, and send to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board an estimate of the amount of funds from subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 99312 and Section 99312.1 to be allocated to it during the next fiscal year pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314.

(b) Not later than each August 1st, on the basis of the amounts continuously appropriated pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 99312 and Section 99312.1 for the applicable fiscal year for purposes of Sections 99313 and 99314, the Controller shall compute,
 publish, and send to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board an estimate of the amount of funds to be allocated to it during the fiscal year. Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2017–18 fiscal year, the Controller shall compute, publish, and send the estimate within 90 days of the enactment of the act amending this section in the 2017–18 Regular Session.

(c) The Controller, along with the actions taken pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), with respect to the allocations under Section 99314, shall also compute, publish, and send to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board the share of funds corresponding to each STA-eligible operator within the jurisdiction of each agency, commission, and board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 6.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99313.

(a) From the funds made available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99312 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1, an amount shall be allocated by the Controller to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board based on the ratio of the population of the area under its jurisdiction to the total population of the state. The Controller shall base these allocations on a report prepared by the Department of Transportation. On or before June 30 of each year, the Department of Transportation shall prepare and submit to the Controller a report detailing the population of each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board. For the purpose of this report,
 the Department of Transportation shall use the most recent population estimates of the Department of Finance and the information provided pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) To assist the Department of Transportation in determining the populations of the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the San Diego Association of Governments, the El Dorado County Transportation Commission, the Placer County Transportation Planning Agency, and the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency for the purpose of subdivision (c) of Section 99312 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1, each of those entities, on or before June 1st of each year, shall provide the department with the population of its respective jurisdiction using the most recent population estimates of the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 176.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

99313.1.

(a) A transportation planning agency, a county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board may transfer any funds that it receives pursuant to Section 99313 to another transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, as applicable. Any funds transferred pursuant to this section shall be used only for the purposes authorized by this chapter and are subject to all statutes and rules and regulations applicable to funds allocated pursuant to Section 99313.

(b) If one transfer has been completed between a transportation planning agency, a county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, pursuant to this section, no
 other transfer may be made between the same parties.

(c) In the event of a transfer of funds to the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority pursuant to this section, the amount of that transfer, if any, which exceeds the amount of funds transferred at that time by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority to the transferring transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, may not be used for the purpose of funding an exclusive public mass transit guideway system project. The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall report to the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing and the Assembly Committee on Transportation on the expenditure of any funds received by it pursuant to a transfer made pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 8.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99313.3.

The amount received by each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314, shall be allocated for public transportation purposes. Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 99312.2, funds received pursuant to Section 99314 may be allocated only to STA-eligible operators. Funds received pursuant to Section 99314 may be expended by STA-eligible operators for community transit services pursuant to Section 99275, including payments or allocations to entities eligible to claim local transportation funds under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, Section 99285 shall continue to apply in the County of Los
 Angeles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 9.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99313.6.

(a) Each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall create a state transit assistance fund and deposit therein the funds allocated to it pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314. The funds attributable to Section 99313 shall be allocated for public transportation purposes, including for community transit services pursuant to Section 99275. Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 99312.2, the funds attributable to Section 99314 shall be allocated only to STA-eligible operators for public transportation purposes.

(b) From funds allocated to it pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority may allocate funds to itself for the
 planning, design, and construction of an exclusive public mass transit guideway system.

(c) An allocation of funds from a state transit assistance fund for a transit capital project may be used for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, equipment trust certificates, bonded or other indebtedness, or in accomplishment of a defeasance of any outstanding revenue bond indenture issued for that project.

(d) From funds allocated to it pursuant to Section 99313, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission may allocate funds to itself for projects to achieve regional transit coordination objectives.

(e) From funds allocated to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 99313, upon a request of the Solano Transportation Authority, the commission may allocate an amount of funds to the authority for
 public transportation purposes, including countywide transit planning and coordination relative to Solano County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 10.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99313.7.

A public agency authorized to file claims with the transportation planning agency and expend funds pursuant to Section 99234.5, 99234.7, or 99234.9 may also receive allocations and expend STA program funds made available pursuant to Section 99313.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 11.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.

(a) From funds made available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99312 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1, an amount shall be allocated by the Controller to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board. The allocation shall include an amount corresponding to the STA-eligible operators within the jurisdiction of each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board. The amount allocated to a transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall be based on the ratio that the total qualifying revenue of all STA-eligible operators in the area under jurisdiction of the
 agency, commission, or board bears to the total qualifying revenue of all STA-eligible operators in the state.
